Washington statutes.
RCW 11.100.035

Investments in securities of certain investment trusts.

(1) Within the standards of judgment and care established by law, and subject to any express provisions or limitations contained in any particular trust instrument, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries, whether individual or corporate, are authorized to acquire and retain securities of any open-end or closed-end management type investment company or investment trust registered under the federal investment company act of 1940 as now or hereafter amended.

(2) Within the limitations of subsection (1) of this section, whenever the trust instrument directs, requires, authorizes, or permits investment in obligations of the United States government, the fiduciary may invest in and hold such obligations either directly or in the form of securities of, or other interests in, an open-end or closed-end management type investment company or investment trust registered under the federal investment company act of 1940, as now or hereafter amended, if both of the following conditions are met:

(a) The portfolio of the investment company or investment trust is limited to obligations of the United States and to repurchase agreements fully collateralized by such obligations; and

(b) The investment company or investment trust takes delivery of the collateral for any repurchase agreement either directly or through an authorized custodian.

(3) If the fiduciary is a bank or trust company, then the fact that the fiduciary, or an affiliate of the fiduciary, provides services to the investment company or investment trust such as that of an investment advisor, custodian, transfer agent, registrar, sponsor, distributor, manager, or otherwise, and is receiving reasonable compensation for those services does not preclude the bank or trust company from investing or reinvesting in the securities of the open-end or closed-end management investment company or investment trust. The fiduciary shall furnish a copy of the prospectus relating to the securities to each person to whom a regular periodic accounting would ordinarily be rendered under the trust instrument or under RCW 11.106.020, upon the request of that person. The restrictions set forth under RCW 11.100.090 may not be construed as prohibiting the fiduciary powers granted under this subsection.

[ 1995 c 307 s 3; 1994 c 221 s 68; 1989 c 97 s 1; 1985 c 30 s 69. Prior: 1955 c 33 s 30.24.035; prior: 1951 c 132 s 1. Formerly RCW 30.24.035.]

NOTES:

Application—1995 c 307: See note following RCW 11.100.010.

Effective dates—1994 c 221: "(1) Except as provided in section 74 of this act, sections 1 through 72 of this act shall take effect January 1, 1995.

(2) *Section 3 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [April 1, 1994]." [ 1994 c 221 s 75.]

*Reviser's note: "Section 3 of this act" is erroneous. This reference was apparently intended to be to section 67. The error arose in the renumbering of sections in the engrossing of amendments to Substitute House Bill No. 2270 (1994 c 221).

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.